District of Columbia statutes.
9-103.04

Entry upon property for survey authorized.

For the purpose of making surveys for such plans and maps the Mayor of the District of Columbia and his agents and employees necessarily engaged in making such surveys are authorized to enter upon any lands through or on which any projected highway or reservation may run or lie.

Mar. 2, 1893, 27 Stat. 534, ch. 197, § 4
1981 Ed., § 7-110.
1973 Ed., § 7-111.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act. 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.